Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-55] Existing contracts not impaired.
Sections 356D-52 and 356D-53 shall not be construed as to impair or affect the
obligation of any contract existing on or before May 9, 1949. [L 2006, c
180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next